Tennessee, session 114, SB0720.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 69-10-107(a)(2), is amended by
deleting "more than two (2) consecutive full terms" and substituting "more than three (3)
consecutive full terms".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0720
002778
- 1 -